Vermont, session 2025-2026, S86.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 2964 is amended to read:
§ 2964. CAMPAIGN REPORTS; CANDIDATES FOR STATE OFFICE,
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, AND COUNTY OFFICE;
POLITICAL COMMITTEES; POLITICAL PARTIES
VT LEG #380297 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.86
2025 Page 2 of 4
* * *
(c) The failure of a candidate, political committee, or political party to file a
report under this section shall be deemed an affirmative statement that a report
is not required of the candidate, political committee, or political party under
this section.
(d) Each candidate for State office, the General Assembly, a two-year-term
county office, or a four-year term county office who is not otherwise required
to file a report pursuant to this section shall file with the Secretary of State a
report and affirmative statement that the candidate has not made expenditures
or accepted contributions in the amounts specified in this section.
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. § 2974 is added to read:
§ 2974. DELINQUENT FILING; PENALTIES
(a) If any registration, report, or disclosure is not filed in the time and
manner required by this chapter:
(1) The Office of the Secretary of State shall issue a notice of
delinquency to the candidate for any registration, report, or disclosure required
of a candidate in the time and manner required by this chapter.
(2) The candidate shall have five business days from the date that the
Office of the Secretary of State issues the notice to cure the delinquency.
(3) Immediately following the five business day period, the delinquent
candidate shall pay a $10.00 penalty for each subsequent day that the
VT LEG #380297 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.86
2025 Page 3 of 4
registration, report, or disclosure remains delinquent. For an individual
delinquent filing, the total amount of penalties imposed pursuant to this section
shall not exceed $1,000.00.
(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (3) of this subsection, the Secretary of
State may reduce or waive any penalty imposed under this section if the
candidate demonstrates good cause, as determined by the Secretary of State.
(b) The Office of the Secretary of State shall send a notice of delinquency
to the email address provided by the candidate in the candidate’s consent of
candidate form.
(c) The Secretary of State may utilize remedies available to a claimant
agency under 32 V.S.A. chapter 151, subchapter 12 to collect any unpaid
penalty.
(d)(1) A candidate who files a report or disclosure with intent to defraud,
falsify, conceal, or cover up by any trick, scheme, or device a material fact; or,
with intent to defraud, make any false, fictitious, or fraudulent claim or
representation as to a material fact; or, with intent to defraud, make or use any
writing or document knowing the same to contain any false, fictitious, or
fraudulent claim or entry as to a material fact shall be considered to have made
a false claim for the purposes of 13 V.S.A. § 3016.
(2) Pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 1223 and section 2904a of this title,
complaints regarding any candidate who fails to properly file a registration,
VT LEG #380297 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.86
2025 Page 4 of 4
report, or disclosure required under this chapter may be filed with the Office of
the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall refer complaints to the
Attorney General or to the State’s Attorney of jurisdiction for investigation, as
appropriate.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380297 v.2